Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall be used to support the
Community Expansion of Nutrition Assistance Program.
SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) shall be used to provide support to
an Oklahoma-based nonprofit in order to preserve sports heritage and
pride in Oklahoma.
SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of One Hundred
Ninety-eight Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Dollars ($198,660.00) shall
be used for community action agencies to support Head Start
programs, and shall not be used for administrative expenses.

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1155 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1155 Page 3